Missouri, session 2026, HB3319.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 208.016, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 208.016, to read as follows:
208.016. In determining the amount of an institutionalized MO HealthNet
individual's income that is to be applied to payment for the costs of care in the institution,
there shall be deducted a personal needs allowance of no less than [thirty dollars per month or
the minimum amount required by 42 U.S.C. 1396a(q)(2) if more than thirty dollars.
Beginning January 1, 2010, the personal needs allowance shall be increased by an amount
equal to the product of the percentage of the Social Security benefit cost-of-living adjustment
and the average amount that MO HealthNet participants are required to contribute to the cost
of institutionalized care. The annual increase in the personal needs allowance shall be
rounded to the nearest whole dollar and shall not exceed five dollars in any year. Once the
personal needs allowance reaches fifty dollars, there shall be no further increases unless
authorized by annual appropriation] seventy dollars per month. On January first of each
year, the minimum personal needs allowance shall increase by a percentage equal to the
percentage increase from the preceding year in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers for the United States as reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics or its
successor index.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.